Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2304
Employer; immunity.

An employer shall not be liable under any state law to any individual for disclosure of information or any other action taken in good faith compliance with the New Hire Reporting Act.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 43.